languagetool-language-modules/pt/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/pt/hunspell/pt_AO.aff
SFX K   r               mos             dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX K   r               is              dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX K   r               m               dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX K   er              ia              dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX K   er              ias             dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX K   er              íamos           dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   er              íamo-nos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   er              íeis            dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   er              iam             dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   zer             sse             dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX K   zer             sseste          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX K   zer             sse             dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX K   zer             ssemos          dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   zer             ssemo-nos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   zer             ssestes         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   zer             sseram          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   zer             ssera           dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             sseras          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             sséramos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             sséramo-nos     dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             sséreis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             sseram          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             rei             dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX K   zer             rás             dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX K   zer             rá              dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX K   zer             remos           dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             remo-nos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             reis            dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             rão             dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             ga              dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX K   zer             gas             dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX K   zer             gamos           dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             gamo-nos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             gais            dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             gam             dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             ssesse          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX K   zer             ssesses         dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX K   zer             sséssemos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   zer             sséssemo-nos    dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   zer             ssésseis        dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   zer             ssessem         dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   zer             sser            dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   zer             sseres          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   zer             sser            dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   zer             ssermos         dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   zer             ssermo-nos      dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   zer             sserdes         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   zer             sserem          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   zer             ria             dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX K   zer             rias            dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX K   zer             ríamos          dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             ríamo-nos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             ríeis           dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             riam            dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             z               dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX K   zer             ga              dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX K   zer             gamos           dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX K   zer             gamo-nos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               i               dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX K   zer             gam             dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               ndo             dizer           +T=g
SFX K   zer             to              dizer           +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX K   zer             ta              dizer           +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX K   zer             tos             dizer           +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX K   zer             tas             dizer           +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX K   0               es              dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=ip
SFX K   0               mos             dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   0               des             dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   0               em              dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=ip
